Illinois, session 104th, HB2912.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Environmental Protection Act is amended by 5changing Section 42 and by adding Section 52.15 as follows: 6    (415 ILCS 5/42)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 1042)7    Sec. 42. Civil penalties. 8    (a) Except as provided in this Section, any person that 9violates any provision of this Act or any regulation adopted 10by the Board, or any permit or term or condition thereof, or 11that violates any order of the Board pursuant to this Act, 12shall be liable for a civil penalty of not to exceed $50,000 13for the violation and an additional civil penalty of not to 14exceed $10,000 for each day during which the violation 15continues; such penalties may, upon order of the Board or a 16court of competent jurisdiction, be made payable to the 17Environmental Protection Trust Fund, to be used in accordance 18with the provisions of the Environmental Protection Trust Fund 19Act.20    (b) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of 21this Section:22        (1) Any person that violates Section 12(f) of this Act 23    or any NPDES permit or term or condition thereof, or any   HB2912- 2 -LRB104 07379 BDA 17419 b1    filing requirement, regulation or order relating to the 2    NPDES permit program, shall be liable to a civil penalty 3    of not to exceed $10,000 per day of violation.4        (2) Any person that violates Section 12(g) of this Act 5    or any UIC permit or term or condition thereof, or any 6    filing requirement, regulation or order relating to the 7    State UIC program for all wells, except Class II wells as 8    defined by the Board under this Act, shall be liable to a 9    civil penalty not to exceed $2,500 per day of violation; 10    provided, however, that any person who commits such 11    violations relating to the State UIC program for Class II 12    wells, as defined by the Board under this Act, shall be 13    liable to a civil penalty of not to exceed $10,000 for the 14    violation and an additional civil penalty of not to exceed 15    $1,000 for each day during which the violation continues.16        (3) Any person that violates Sections 21(f), 21(g), 17    21(h) or 21(i) of this Act, or any RCRA permit or term or 18    condition thereof, or any filing requirement, regulation 19    or order relating to the State RCRA program, shall be 20    liable to a civil penalty of not to exceed $25,000 per day 21    of violation.22        (4) In an administrative citation action under Section 23    31.1 of this Act, any person found to have violated any 24    provision of subsection (o) of Section 21 of this Act 25    shall pay a civil penalty of $500 for each violation of 26    each such provision, plus any hearing costs incurred by   HB2912- 3 -LRB104 07379 BDA 17419 b1    the Board and the Agency. Such penalties shall be made 2    payable to the Environmental Protection Trust Fund, to be 3    used in accordance with the provisions of the 4    Environmental Protection Trust Fund Act; except that if a 5    unit of local government issued the administrative 6    citation, 50% of the civil penalty shall be payable to the 7    unit of local government.8        (4-5) In an administrative citation action under 9    Section 31.1 of this Act, any person found to have 10    violated any provision of subsection (p) of Section 21, 11    Section 22.38, Section 22.51, Section 22.51a, or 12    subsection (k) of Section 55 of this Act shall pay a civil 13    penalty of $1,500 for each violation of each such 14    provision, plus any hearing costs incurred by the Board 15    and the Agency, except that the civil penalty amount shall 16    be $3,000 for each violation of any provision of 17    subsection (p) of Section 21, Section 22.38, Section 18    22.51, Section 22.51a, or subsection (k) of Section 55 19    that is the person's second or subsequent adjudication 20    violation of that provision. The penalties shall be 21    deposited into the Environmental Protection Trust Fund, to 22    be used in accordance with the provisions of the 23    Environmental Protection Trust Fund Act; except that if a 24    unit of local government issued the administrative 25    citation, 50% of the civil penalty shall be payable to the 26    unit of local government.  HB2912- 4 -LRB104 07379 BDA 17419 b1        (5) Any person who violates subsection 6 of Section 2    39.5 of this Act or any CAAPP permit, or term or condition 3    thereof, or any fee or filing requirement, or any duty to 4    allow or carry out inspection, entry or monitoring 5    activities, or any regulation or order relating to the 6    CAAPP shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed 7    $10,000 per day of violation.8        (6) Any owner or operator of a community water system 9    that violates subsection (b) of Section 18.1 or subsection 10    (a) of Section 25d-3 of this Act shall, for each day of 11    violation, be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed $5 12    for each of the premises connected to the affected 13    community water system.14        (7) Any person who violates Section 52.5 of this Act 15    shall be liable for a civil penalty of up to $1,000 for the 16    first violation of that Section and a civil penalty of up 17    to $2,500 for a second or subsequent violation of that 18    Section. 19        (8) Any person who violates Section 52.15 of this Act 20    shall receive a warning from the Agency for the first 21    violation of that Section and shall be liable for a civil 22    penalty of up to $500 for the second violation of that 23    Section and a civil penalty of up to $1,000 for a third or 24    subsequent violation of that Section. The release of up to 25    25 balloons shall be considered a single offense under 26    that Section. The release of more than 25 balloons shall   HB2912- 5 -LRB104 07379 BDA 17419 b1    constitute a separate violation for every 25 balloons 2    released. 3    (b.5) In lieu of the penalties set forth in subsections 4(a) and (b) of this Section, any person who fails to file, in a 5timely manner, toxic chemical release forms with the Agency 6pursuant to Section 25b-2 of this Act shall be liable for a 7civil penalty of $100 per day for each day the forms are late, 8not to exceed a maximum total penalty of $6,000. This daily 9penalty shall begin accruing on the thirty-first day after the 10date that the person receives the warning notice issued by the 11Agency pursuant to Section 25b-6 of this Act; and the penalty 12shall be paid to the Agency. The daily accrual of penalties 13shall cease as of January 1 of the following year. All 14penalties collected by the Agency pursuant to this subsection 15shall be deposited into the Environmental Protection Permit 16and Inspection Fund.17    (c) Any person that violates this Act, any rule or 18regulation adopted under this Act, any permit or term or 19condition of a permit, or any Board order and causes the death 20of fish or aquatic life shall, in addition to the other 21penalties provided by this Act, be liable to pay to the State 22an additional sum for the reasonable value of the fish or 23aquatic life destroyed. Any money so recovered shall be placed 24in the Wildlife and Fish Fund in the State Treasury.25    (d) The penalties provided for in this Section may be 26recovered in a civil action.  HB2912- 6 -LRB104 07379 BDA 17419 b1    (e) The State's Attorney of the county in which the 2violation occurred, or the Attorney General, may, at the 3request of the Agency or on his own motion, institute a civil 4action for an injunction, prohibitory or mandatory, to 5restrain violations of this Act, any rule or regulation 6adopted under this Act, any permit or term or condition of a 7permit, or any Board order, or to require such other actions as 8may be necessary to address violations of this Act, any rule or 9regulation adopted under this Act, any permit or term or 10condition of a permit, or any Board order.11    (f) The State's Attorney of the county in which the 12violation occurred, or the Attorney General, shall bring such 13actions in the name of the people of the State of Illinois. 14Without limiting any other authority which may exist for the 15awarding of attorney's fees and costs, the Board or a court of 16competent jurisdiction may award costs and reasonable 17attorney's fees, including the reasonable costs of expert 18witnesses and consultants, to the State's Attorney or the 19Attorney General in a case where he has prevailed against a 20person who has committed a willful, knowing, or repeated 21violation of this Act, any rule or regulation adopted under 22this Act, any permit or term or condition of a permit, or any 23Board order.24    Any funds collected under this subsection (f) in which the 25Attorney General has prevailed shall be deposited in the 26Hazardous Waste Fund created in Section 22.2 of this Act. Any   HB2912- 7 -LRB104 07379 BDA 17419 b1funds collected under this subsection (f) in which a State's 2Attorney has prevailed shall be retained by the county in 3which he serves.4    (g) All final orders imposing civil penalties pursuant to 5this Section shall prescribe the time for payment of such 6penalties. If any such penalty is not paid within the time 7prescribed, interest on such penalty at the rate set forth in 8subsection (a) of Section 1003 of the Illinois Income Tax Act, 9shall be paid for the period from the date payment is due until 10the date payment is received. However, if the time for payment 11is stayed during the pendency of an appeal, interest shall not 12accrue during such stay.13    (h) In determining the appropriate civil penalty to be 14imposed under subdivisions (a), (b)(1), (b)(2), (b)(3), 15(b)(5), (b)(6), or (b)(7), or (b)(8) of this Section, the 16Board is authorized to consider any matters of record in 17mitigation or aggravation of penalty, including, but not 18limited to, the following factors:19        (1) the duration and gravity of the violation;20        (2) the presence or absence of due diligence on the 21    part of the respondent in attempting to comply with 22    requirements of this Act and regulations thereunder or to 23    secure relief therefrom as provided by this Act;24        (3) any economic benefits accrued by the respondent 25    because of delay in compliance with requirements, in which 26    case the economic benefits shall be determined by the   HB2912- 8 -LRB104 07379 BDA 17419 b1    lowest cost alternative for achieving compliance;2        (4) the amount of monetary penalty which will serve to 3    deter further violations by the respondent and to 4    otherwise aid in enhancing voluntary compliance with this 5    Act by the respondent and other persons similarly subject 6    to the Act;7        (5) the number, proximity in time, and gravity of 8    previously adjudicated violations of this Act by the 9    respondent;10        (6) whether the respondent voluntarily self-disclosed, 11    in accordance with subsection (i) of this Section, the 12    non-compliance to the Agency;13        (7) whether the respondent has agreed to undertake a 14    "supplemental environmental project", which means an 15    environmentally beneficial project that a respondent 16    agrees to undertake in settlement of an enforcement action 17    brought under this Act, but which the respondent is not 18    otherwise legally required to perform; and19        (8) whether the respondent has successfully completed 20    a Compliance Commitment Agreement under subsection (a) of 21    Section 31 of this Act to remedy the violations that are 22    the subject of the complaint. 23    In determining the appropriate civil penalty to be imposed 24under subsection (a) or paragraph (1), (2), (3), (5), (6), or 25(7), or (8) of subsection (b) of this Section, the Board shall 26ensure, in all cases, that the penalty is at least as great as   HB2912- 9 -LRB104 07379 BDA 17419 b1the economic benefits, if any, accrued by the respondent as a 2result of the violation, unless the Board finds that 3imposition of such penalty would result in an arbitrary or 4unreasonable financial hardship. However, such civil penalty 5may be off-set in whole or in part pursuant to a supplemental 6environmental project agreed to by the complainant and the 7respondent.8    (i) A person who voluntarily self-discloses non-compliance 9to the Agency, of which the Agency had been unaware, is 10entitled to a 100% reduction in the portion of the penalty that 11is not based on the economic benefit of non-compliance if the 12person can establish the following:13        (1) that either the regulated entity is a small entity 14    or the non-compliance was discovered through an 15    environmental audit or a compliance management system 16    documented by the regulated entity as reflecting the 17    regulated entity's due diligence in preventing, detecting, 18    and correcting violations;19        (2) that the non-compliance was disclosed in writing 20    within 30 days of the date on which the person discovered 21    it;22        (3) that the non-compliance was discovered and 23    disclosed prior to:24            (i) the commencement of an Agency inspection, 25        investigation, or request for information;26            (ii) notice of a citizen suit;  HB2912- 10 -LRB104 07379 BDA 17419 b1            (iii) the filing of a complaint by a citizen, the 2        Illinois Attorney General, or the State's Attorney of 3        the county in which the violation occurred;4            (iv) the reporting of the non-compliance by an 5        employee of the person without that person's 6        knowledge; or7            (v) imminent discovery of the non-compliance by 8        the Agency;9        (4) that the non-compliance is being corrected and any 10    environmental harm is being remediated in a timely 11    fashion;12        (5) that the person agrees to prevent a recurrence of 13    the non-compliance;14        (6) that no related non-compliance events have 15    occurred in the past 3 years at the same facility or in the 16    past 5 years as part of a pattern at multiple facilities 17    owned or operated by the person;18        (7) that the non-compliance did not result in serious 19    actual harm or present an imminent and substantial 20    endangerment to human health or the environment or violate 21    the specific terms of any judicial or administrative order 22    or consent agreement;23        (8) that the person cooperates as reasonably requested 24    by the Agency after the disclosure; and25        (9) that the non-compliance was identified voluntarily 26    and not through a monitoring, sampling, or auditing   HB2912- 11 -LRB104 07379 BDA 17419 b1    procedure that is required by statute, rule, permit, 2    judicial or administrative order, or consent agreement.3    If a person can establish all of the elements under this 4subsection except the element set forth in paragraph (1) of 5this subsection, the person is entitled to a 75% reduction in 6the portion of the penalty that is not based upon the economic 7benefit of non-compliance.8    For the purposes of this subsection (i), "small entity" 9has the same meaning as in Section 221 of the federal Small 10Business Regulatory Enforcement Fairness Act of 1996 (5 U.S.C. 11601). 12    (j) In addition to any other remedy or penalty that may 13apply, whether civil or criminal, any person who violates 14Section 22.52 of this Act shall be liable for an additional 15civil penalty of up to 3 times the gross amount of any 16pecuniary gain resulting from the violation. 17    (k) In addition to any other remedy or penalty that may 18apply, whether civil or criminal, any person who violates 19subdivision (a)(7.6) of Section 31 of this Act shall be liable 20for an additional civil penalty of $2,000. 21(Source: P.A. 102-310, eff. 8-6-21.) 22    (415 ILCS 5/52.15 new)23    Sec. 52.15. Release of balloons.24    (a) In this Section:25    "Balloon" means any inflatable object manufactured from   HB2912- 12 -LRB104 07379 BDA 17419 b1plastic, latex, rubber, or mylar that is filled with a 2lighter-than-air gas, such as helium. "Balloon" does not 3include hot air balloons used to carry human passengers. 4    "Institution of higher education" means a nonpublic 5institution of higher education or a public institution of 6higher education, as those terms are defined in Section 2 of 7the Higher Education Cooperation Act. 8    (b) A person may not knowingly release or cause to be 9released into the atmosphere within a 24-hour period 25 or 10more helium or other lighter-than-air gas balloons in the 11State.12    (c) This Section does not apply to the following:13        (1) Balloons used by an institution of higher 14    education or a governmental agency, or pursuant to a 15    governmental contract, for bona fide scientific or 16    meteorological purposes.17        (2) Balloons that are released indoors and remain 18    indoors.19        (3) The release of a helium balloon used for the safe 20    operation of a hot air balloon.